Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 37 Rhode Island Fair Housing Practices Act
34-37-5.
Prevention of unlawful housing practices.

The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any person from violating any of the provisions of this chapter, provided that before instituting a formal proceeding, it shall attempt by informal methods of conference, persuasion, and conciliation to induce compliance with this chapter.

Upon the commission’s own initiative or whenever an aggrieved individual or an organization chartered for the purpose of or engaged in combating discrimination or racism or of safeguarding civil liberties, that organization acting on behalf of one or more individuals being hereinafter referred to as the complainant, makes a charge, in writing, under oath, to the commission that any person, agency, bureau, corporation, or association, hereinafter referred to as the respondent, has violated or is violating, to the best of complainant’s knowledge and belief, any of the provisions of this chapter, and that the alleged discriminatory housing practice has occurred or terminated within one year of the date of filing, the commission may initiate a preliminary investigation and if it shall determine after the investigation that it is probable that unlawful housing practices have been or are being engaged in, it shall endeavor to eliminate the unlawful housing practices by informal methods of conference, conciliation, and persuasion. Nothing said or done during these endeavors may be used as evidence in any subsequent proceeding. If after the investigation and conference, the commission is satisfied that any unlawful housing practice of the respondent will be eliminated, it may, with the consent of the complainant, treat the charge as conciliated, and entry of that disposition shall be made on the records of the commission. If the commission fails to effect the elimination of the unlawful housing practices and to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter, or, if the circumstances warrant, in advance of any preliminary investigation or endeavors, the commission shall have the power to issue and cause to be served upon any person or respondent a complaint stating the charges in that respect and containing a notice of hearing before the commission, a member thereof, or a hearing examiner at a place therein fixed to be held not less than ten (10) days after the service of the complaint.

The commission, member thereof, or hearing examiner conducting the hearing shall have the power reasonably and fairly to amend any written complaint at any time prior to the issuance of an order based thereon. The respondent shall have like power to amend its answer to the original or amended complaint at any time prior to the issuance of the order. The commissioner assigned to the preliminary hearing of any charge shall take no part in the final hearing except as a witness upon competent matters and will have no part in the determination or decision of the case after hearing.

The respondent shall have the right to file an answer to the complaint and shall appear at the hearing in person or otherwise with or without counsel to present evidence and to examine and cross-examine witnesses.

In any proceeding, the commission, its member, or its agent shall not be bound by the rules of evidence prevailing in the courts.

The commission shall in ascertaining the practices followed by the respondent take into account all evidence, statistical or otherwise, that may tend to prove the existence of a predetermined pattern of discrimination in housing.

The testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and shall be reduced to writing and filed with the commission. Thereafter, in its discretion, the commission upon notice may take further testimony or hear argument.

If upon all the testimony taken the commission shall determine that the respondent has engaged in or is engaging in unlawful housing practices, the commission shall state its findings of fact and shall issue and cause to be served on the respondent an order requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the unlawful housing practices, and to take further affirmative or other action as will effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

The commission may also order the respondent to pay the complainant damages sustained thereby; costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred at any time in connection with the commission of the unlawful act, and civil penalties, any amounts awarded to be deposited in the state treasury. The civil penalty shall be (i) An amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) if the respondent has not been adjudged to have committed any prior discriminatory housing practice; (ii) In an amount not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed one other discriminatory housing practice during the five-year (5) period ending on the date of filing this charge; and (iii) In an amount not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed two (2) or more discriminatory housing practices during the seven-year (7) period ending on the date of the filing of this charge; except that if the acts constituting the discriminatory housing practice that is the object of the charge are committed by the same natural person who has been previously adjudged to have committed acts constituting a discriminatory housing practice, then the civil penalties set forth in (ii) and (iii) may be imposed without regard to the period of time within which any subsequent discriminatory housing practice occurred. When determining the amount of civil penalties, the commission shall consider as a mitigating factor whether the respondent has acted in good faith and whether the respondent has actively engaged in regular antidiscrimination educational programs. Provided that no order shall affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of the order and involving a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant without actual notice of the charge filed under this title.

If the commission shall find that no probable cause exists for crediting the charges, or, if upon all the evidence, it shall find that a respondent has not engaged in unfair housing practices, the commission shall state its findings of fact and shall issue and cause to be served on the complainant an order dismissing the complaint as to the respondent. A copy of the order shall be delivered in all cases to the attorney general and such other public officers as the commission deems proper.

Until a transcript of the record in a case shall be filed in a court as provided in subsection (m), the commission may at any time, upon reasonable notice, and in such manner as it shall deem proper, modify or set aside, in whole or in part, any of its findings or orders.

Until such time as a hearing is convened pursuant to this section, no publicity shall be given to any proceedings before the commission, either by the commission or any employee thereof, the complainant, or the respondent, except that in the event of a conciliation agreement the agreement shall be made public unless the complainant and respondent otherwise agree and the commission determines that disclosure is not required to further the purposes of this chapter. After the complaint issues and before an order issues, the commission shall not initiate any public notice of any charge or complaint before the commission, however, the commission may respond to inquiries about the status of a complaint.

A complainant may seek a right to sue in state court if not less than one hundred and twenty (120) days and not more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date of filing of a charge, if the commission has been unable to secure a settlement agreement or conciliation agreement and if the commission has not commenced hearing on a complaint. The commission shall grant the right to sue within thirty (30) days after receipt of the request. This shall terminate all proceedings before the commission and shall give to the complainant the right to commence suit in the superior court within any county as provided in §

28-5-28

within ninety (90) days after the granting of the request. Any party may claim a trial by jury. The superior court may make orders consistent with subsection (h) and may also award punitive damages and such other damages as the court deems just and proper.

The commission is further empowered to file a complaint in the superior court in any county in which the unlawful housing practice allegedly occurs, or has occurred, or in which a defendant resides or maintains a business office, or in Providence County, seeking injunctive relief, including a temporary restraining order, against the defendant.

No preliminary injunction shall be effective for more than thirty (30) days; provided that, if the defendant has sought judicial review of an order of the commission issued pursuant to this section, or if the commission has sought a decree of the court for the enforcement of the order, the preliminary injunction shall remain in full force and effect until such time as the judicial review or the commission’s petition for the decree of enforcement is finally heard and determined.

In any proceeding under this subsection, the commission may, if the prayer of the original or amended complaint so requests, proceed at the proper time to obtain the relief provided in §

34-37-6

.

The application by the commission for injunctive relief shall not prevent the commission from continuing to prosecute the proceeding before it out of which the application arises.

Whenever a complaint shall be filed under the provisions of this subsection, the state shall be liable, in an action brought against it, for the payment of such costs and damages as may have been incurred or suffered by the defendant should final judgment be entered upon the complaint in favor of the defendant, or should the commission, having been denied temporary relief after the entry of a restraining order, fail to prosecute the matter further, or should the commission, having been granted temporary relief, fail to prosecute the matter further, unless, in the latter two (2) instances, failure to prosecute is caused by the making of an agreed settlement of any kind with the defendant, including a conciliation agreement.

All proceedings taken pursuant to the provisions of this section shall take precedence over all other civil matters then pending before the court.

The complainant or the respondent may elect, within twenty (20) days after receipt of a finding of probable cause, to terminate by written notice to the commission all proceedings before the commission and have the case heard in the superior court. In the event of an election to terminate the proceedings, the commission shall issue a right to sue notice to the complainant with a copy of the notice sent to all parties.

The complainant shall have the right to commence suit in the superior court within any county as provided in §

28-5-28

within ninety (90) days of the date of the right to sue notice. Either party may claim a trial by jury in the superior court.

Notwithstanding the termination of proceedings before the commission upon the granting of the right to sue notice, the parties may agree to have the commission seek to conciliate or mediate settlement of the case within the ninety-day (90) period in which the complainant has the right to commence suit in superior court.

If an election is made under subsection (n):

The complainant, the commission, or the attorney general may commence a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved person in the superior court within any county as provided in §

28-5-28

within ninety (90) days of the date of the right to sue notice under subsection (n);

Any party may claim a trial by jury. Any aggrieved person with respect to the issues to be determined in a civil action under this subsection may intervene as of right in that civil action;

The superior court may make orders consistent with subsection (h) and may also award punitive damages and such damages as the court deems just and proper; provided, that the court shall not enter a consent order, dismissal stipulation, or judgment settling claims of discrimination in an action or proceeding under this chapter, unless the parties and their counsel attest that a waiver of all or substantially all attorneys’ fees was not compelled as a condition of the settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 58, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 664, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 124, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 125, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

34-37-5.1.
Interference, coercion, or intimidation.

It shall be unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his or her having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of his or her having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by this chapter. No owner under this chapter or any agent of these shall discriminate in any manner against any individual because he or she has opposed any practice forbidden by this chapter, or because he or she has made a charge, testified, or assisted in any manner in any investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 1.

34-37-5.2.
Discrimination in brokerage services.

It shall be unlawful to deny any person who meets licensing and other non-discriminatory requirements that are also applied to other applicants and members access to, or membership or participation in, any real estate listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling, leasing, or renting a housing accommodation or to discriminate against him or her in the terms or conditions of the access, membership, or participation on account of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, or familial status.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 180, § 1.

34-37-5.3.
Fostering of segregated housing prohibited.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory housing practice to for profit induce, or attempt to induce, any person to sell or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color, religion, marital status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, or familial status.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 3, § 1, effective April 15, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 4, § 1, effective April 15, 2021.

34-37-5.4.
Discrimination in residential real estate related transactions.

It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminate against any person in making available a transaction, or in the terms and conditions of the transaction, because of race, color, religion, marital status, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, or familial status.

As used in this section, the term “residential real estate-related transaction” means any of the following:

The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance:

For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling; or

Secured by residential real estate.

The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property to take into consideration factors other than race, color, religion, marital status, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, or familial status.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 340, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 180, § 1.

34-37-5.5.
Freedom of condominium owners and apartment renters to display certain religious items.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, a landlord or owner, as defined in §

34-18-11

; a management committee, as defined in §

34-36-3

; or an association of unit owners, as defined in §

34-36.1-1.03

(hereinafter “property owners”); may not enforce or adopt a restrictive covenant or otherwise prohibit a unit owner or tenant from displaying or affixing on the entry to the unit owner’s or tenant’s dwelling one or more religious items, the display of which is motivated by the unit owner’s or tenant’s sincere religious belief.

This section does not prohibit the enforcement or adoption of a covenant that, to the extent allowed by the constitutions of this state and the United States, prohibits the display or affixing of a religious item on the entry to the unit owner’s or tenant’s dwelling that:

Threatens the public health or safety;

Violates the provisions of chapter 37 of title 34 or any other state or federal law barring discrimination in housing, or any other law;

Is in a location other than the entry door or door frame or extends past the outer edge of the door frame of the unit owner’s or resident’s dwelling; or

Individually, or in combination with each other religious item displayed or affixed on the entry door or door frame, has a total size of greater than twenty-five (25) square inches.

Except as otherwise provided, this section does not authorize a unit owner or tenant to use a material or color for an entry door or door frame of the owner’s or resident’s dwelling or make an alteration to the entry door or door frame that is not authorized by the restrictive covenant governing the dwelling.

A property owner’s association may remove an item displayed in violation of a restrictive covenant permitted by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 184, § 1.

34-37-6.
Judicial review and enforcement.

Any complainant, intervener, or respondent claiming to be aggrieved by a final order of the commission may obtain judicial review thereof, and the commission may obtain an order of court for its enforcement, in a proceeding as provided in this section. The proceeding shall be brought in the superior court of the state within any county wherein the unlawful housing practices which are the subject of the commission’s order were committed or wherein any respondent, required in the order to cease and desist from unfair housing practices or to take other affirmative action, resides or transacts business.

The proceeding shall be initiated by the filing of a petition in the court, and the service of a copy of the petition upon the commission and upon all parties who appeared before the commission. Thereupon the court shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding and of the questions determined therein, and shall have power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper, and to make and enter upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in the transcript an order enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as so modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the order of the commission.

An objection that has not been urged before the commission, its member, or agent shall not be considered by the court, unless the failure or neglect to urge the objection shall be excused because of extraordinary circumstances.

If either party shall apply to the court for leave to adduce additional evidence and shall show to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to adduce the evidence in the hearing before the commission, its member, or agent, the court may order the additional evidence to be taken before the commission, its member, or agent and to be made a part of the transcript.

The commission may modify its findings as to the facts, or make new findings, by reason of additional evidence so taken and filed. The commission shall file the modified or new findings and its recommendations, if any, for the modification or setting aside of its original order.

The jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive and its judgment and order shall be, when necessary, subject to review by the supreme court as provided by law, to which court appeal from the judgment and order may be made as provided by law.

The commission’s copy of the testimony shall be available at all reasonable times to all parties without cost of examination and for the purposes of judicial review of the order of the commission. The petition shall be heard on the transcript of the record without requirement of printing.

The commission may appear in court by its own attorneys.

If no proceeding to obtain judicial review is instituted by a complainant, intervener, or respondent within thirty (30) days from the service of an order of the commission pursuant to subsection (h) of §

34-37-5

, the commission or the complainant may obtain a decree of the court for the enforcement of the order upon showing that respondent is subject to the commission’s jurisdiction, and resides or transacts business within the county in which the petition for enforcement is brought.

The commission may proceed in the same manner as provided in §

28-5-13

as to the powers, duties, and rights of the commission, its members, hearing examiners, the complainant, intervener, and respondent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 1.

34-37-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 32, § 3, effective May 22, 1995.

34-37-8.
Appropriation.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as is deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or so much thereof as may be required from time to time upon the receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1.

34-37-9.
Construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment of the purposes intended and any provisions of any law inconsistent with any provisions hereof shall not apply. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to repeal any of the provisions of any law of the state prohibiting discrimination based on race or color, religion, sex, marital status, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, or familial status. Nothing contained in this chapter shall restrict the original jurisdiction of the courts to proceed with evictions as provided in chapter 18 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 8; P.L. 2015, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 180, § 1.

34-37-10.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall, for any reason, be adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter or its application to other persons or circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1.

34-37-11.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as “The Rhode Island Fair Housing Practices Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 27, § 1.